Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3005.01
Supervising podiatrist, defined.

Supervising podiatrist means a licensed podiatrist who supervises a physician assistant under a collaborative agreement.

Laws 2020, LB755, § 20.